Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-422.01
Memory care endorsement, defined.

Memory care endorsement means an endorsement for the license of an assisted-living facility providing care for persons with cognitive impairments or dementia which meets the requirements for the endorsement under section 71-472.

Laws 2016, LB698, § 19.
July 21, 2016